nl: Ondersteunde gewichtseenheid: Kilogrammen (kg); Ponden (lbs); Stones (st); Andere
bg-BG: Поддържана единица за тегло: Килограми (kg); Паунди (lbs); Камъни (st); Други
ro-RO: Unitatea de greutate acceptată: Kilograme (kg); Livre (lbs); Stone (st); Altele
vi: Đơn vị trọng lượng được hỗ trợ: Kilôgam (kg); Pound (lb); Stone (st); Khác
ko: 지원되는 무게 단위: 킬로그램(kg); 파운드(lb); 스톤(st); 기타
pl: Obsługiwana jednostka masy: Kilogramy (kg); Funty (lbs); Kamienie (st); Inne
sk-SK: Podporovaná jednotka hmotnosti: Kilogramy (kg); Libry (lbs); Kamene (st); Iné
fi: Tuettu painoyksikkö: Kilogrammaa (kg); Naulaa (lbs); Stonea (st); Muu
hr-HR: Podržana jedinica težine: Kilograms (kg); Funte (lbs); Kamen (st); Ostalo
fr: Unité de poids prise en charge: Kilogrammes (kg); Livres (lbs); Stones (st); Autre
hu: Támogatott tömegegység: Kilogramm (kg); Font (lbs); Stone (st); Egyéb
nb: Støttet vektenhet: Kilogram (kg); Pund (lbs); Stones (st); Annet
zh-CN: 支持的重量单位: 公斤 (kg); 磅 (lbs); 英石 (st); 其他
el: Υποστηριζόμενη μονάδα βάρους: κιλά (kg); Λίρες (λίβρες); Stones (st); Άλλο
ja: 対応している重量単位: キログラム (kg); ポンド (lbs); ストーンズ (st); その他
pt-BR: Unidade de peso suportada: Quilogramas (kg); Libras (lbs); Pedras (st); Outro
pt-PT: Unidade de peso suportada: Quilogramas (kg); Libras (lbs); Stones (st); Outro
es: Unidad de peso admitida: Kilogramos (kg); Libras (libras); Piedras (st); Otros
lt-LT: Palaikomi svorio vienetai: Kilogramai (kg); Svarai (lbs); Akmenys (st); Kita
tr: Desteklenen ağırlık birimi: Kilogram (kg); Pound (lbs); Stone (st); Diğer
zh-TW: 支援重量單位: 公斤 (kg); 磅 (lbs); 英石 (st); 其他
ru: Поддерживаемая единица веса: Килограммы (кг); Фунты (lbs); Камни (st); Другое
th: หน่วยน้ำหนักที่รองรับ: กิโลกรัม (กก.); ปอนด์; สโตน; อื่นๆ
da: Vægtenhed understøttet: Kilogram (kg); Pund (lbs); Sten (st); Andet
de: Unterstützte Gewichtseinheit: Kilogramm (kg); Pfund (lbs); Stone (st); Sonstiges
it: Unità di peso supportata: Chilogrammi (kg); Libbre (lb); Stone (st); Altro
cs: Podporovaná jednotka hmotnosti: Kilogramy (kg); Libry (lbs); Kameny (st); Jiné
en: Weight unit supported: Kilograms (kg); Pounds (lbs); Stones (st); Other
sv: Kompatibel viktenhet: Kilogram (kg); Pounds (lbs); Stone (st); Övrigt
sl-SI: Podprta enota za težo: Kilogrami (kg); Funti (lbs); Kamni (st); Drugo